District of Columbia statutes.
1-333.02

Inspector of Asphalts and Cements; limitation upon compensation and services.

The Inspector of Asphalts and Cements shall not receive or accept compensation of any kind from or perform any work or render any services of a character required of him officially by the District of Columbia to any person, firm, corporation, or municipality other than the District of Columbia.

History

Sept. 1, 1916, 39 Stat. 679, ch. 433

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-341.
1973 Ed., § 1-307.